Indiana, session 2026, HB1366.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-46.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 46.5. Apprenticeship Tax Credit
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "department of workforce
development" means the department of workforce development
established by IC 22-4.1-2-1.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "eligible employer" means a
person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or
other entity.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "pass through entity" means:
(1) a corporation that is exempt from the adjusted gross
income tax under IC 6-3-2-2.8(2);
(2) a partnership;
(3) a trust;
(4) an estate;
(5) a limited liability company; or
2026 IN 1366—LS 6998/DI 125


(6) a limited liability partnership.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "qualified apprenticeship"
means an apprenticeship that is:
(1) certified as an industry recognized apprenticeship
program by an entity determined to meet United States
Department of Labor criteria;
(2) registered with the United States Department of Labor; or
(3) offered through or in conjunction with a program
developed by the department of workforce development.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "state tax liability" means a
taxpayer's total tax liability that is incurred under:
(1) IC 6-3-1 through IC 6-3-7 (the adjusted gross income tax);
and
(2) IC 6-5.5 (the financial institutions tax);
as computed after the application of the credits that under
IC 6-3.1-1-2 are to be applied before the credit provided by this
chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "taxpayer" means an eligible
employer that has state tax liability.
Sec. 7. (a) Subject to subsection (b), a taxpayer that employs an
individual for at least seven (7) full months in a taxable year in a
qualified apprenticeship that has been certified by the department
of workforce development is eligible for a credit against the
taxpayer's state tax liability in the taxable year in which the
taxpayer employs the apprentice.
(b) An individual may not be certified as being employed in a
qualified apprenticeship for purposes of claiming the credit under
this chapter:
(1) after the earlier of:
(A) the date that falls four (4) years after the individual's
first day of employment with the employer; or
(B) the conclusion of the term of the apprenticeship
position; or
(2) if the individual was employed in another position with the
employer immediately before beginning employment in the
apprenticeship position.
Sec. 8. (a) The amount of the credit is two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500) for each individual employed in a
qualified apprenticeship position. However, and except as provided
in subsection (b), a taxpayer may not claim a credit for more than
one (1) individual employed in a qualified apprenticeship position
under this chapter in a taxable year.
2026 IN 1366—LS 6998/DI 125


(b) A taxpayer may claim a credit under this chapter for up to
six (6) individuals employed in a qualified apprenticeship position
during a taxable year if at least half of the number of individuals
for whom the credit is claimed are:
(1) foster children participating in a transition to independent
living program with the department of child services;
(2) military veterans;
(3) spouses of individuals in the military; or
(4) women.
Sec. 9. A taxpayer may apply to the department of workforce
development for a certification of a position as a qualified
apprenticeship in the manner provided by the department of
workforce development. The department of workforce
development may certify that a particular position is a qualified
apprenticeship or deny the request.
Sec. 10. A taxpayer is not entitled to a carryback or refund of
any unused credit.
Sec. 11. If a pass through entity is entitled to a credit under
section 7 of this chapter but does not have state tax liability against
which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder, partner, or
member of the pass through entity is entitled to a tax credit equal
to:
(1) the tax credit determined for the pass through entity for
the taxable year; multiplied by
(2) the percentage of the pass through entity's distributive
income to which the shareholder, partner, or member is
entitled.
Sec. 12. To apply a credit against the taxpayer's state tax
liability, a taxpayer must claim the credit on the taxpayer's annual
state tax return or returns in the manner prescribed by the
department. The taxpayer shall submit to the department the
information that the department determines is necessary for the
department to determine whether the taxpayer is eligible for the
credit.
SECTION 2. IC 25-1-24.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 24.5. Neighboring State Licensure Recognition
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter
applies to any license, certificate, registration, or permit issued by
a board under this article.
(b) This chapter does not apply to the issuance or regulation of
2026 IN 1366—LS 6998/DI 125


any license, certificate, registration, or permit for the following:
(1) Any health care practitioners, including a license,
certificate, registration, or permit issued under:
(A) IC 25-14;
(B) IC 25-22.5;
(C) IC 25-23;
(D) IC 25-23.5;
(E) IC 25-24;
(F) IC 25-26;
(G) IC 25-27;
(H) IC 25-27.5; or
(I) IC 25-33.
(2) Architects under IC 25-4.
(3) Engineers under IC 25-31.
(4) Certified public accountants under IC 25-2.1.
(5) Veterinarians or veterinary technicians under IC 25-38.1.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, a board shall issue a
license, certificate, registration, or permit to an individual to allow
the individual to practice the individual's occupation in Indiana if,
upon application to the board, the individual satisfies the following
conditions:
(1) Holds a current license, certification, registration, or
permit from Ohio, Michigan, Illinois, or Kentucky, and that
jurisdiction's requirements for a license, certificate,
registration, or permit are substantially equivalent to or
exceed the requirements for a license, certificate, registration,
or permit of the board from which the applicant is seeking
licensure, certification, registration, or a permit.
(2) Can demonstrate competency in the occupation through
methods as determined by the board.
(3) Has held the license, certification, registration, or permit
required under subdivision (1) for at least one (1) year.
(4) Has not committed any act in any jurisdiction that would
have constituted grounds for refusal, suspension, or
revocation of a license, certificate, registration, or permit to
practice that occupation in Indiana at the time the act was
committed.
(5) Is in good standing and has not been disciplined by the
agency that has jurisdiction to issue the license, certification,
registration, or permit.
(6) Does not have a complaint or investigation pending before
an occupational licensing board that relates to unprofessional
2026 IN 1366—LS 6998/DI 125


conduct or an alleged crime.
(7) Pays any fees required by the board for which the
applicant is seeking licensure, certification, registration, or a
permit.
(8) Has passed an examination for the license, certification,
registration, or permit required under subdivision (1) if an
examination was required in the jurisdiction.
(9) Does not have a disqualifying criminal history.
Sec. 3. If an individual had any disciplinary action taken against
the individual or the individual's license, certification, registration,
or permit in the jurisdiction in which the individual holds a license,
certification, registration, or permit described in section 2(1) of this
chapter, the individual shall confirm, and provide evidence, that
the disciplinary action has been resolved and of the corrective
action taken.
Sec. 4. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to invalidate
any existing reciprocity agreement between a board in Indiana and
a board in another jurisdiction.
Sec. 5. An individual who receives a license, certification,
registration, or permit under this chapter is entitled to the same
rights and subject to the same obligations as an individual who
receives a license, certification, registration, or permit under this
title.
SECTION 3. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) IC 6-3.1-46.5, as
added by this act, applies to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2029.
2026 IN 1366—LS 6998/DI 125